Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.250

Examinations—Waiver.

(1) The administrator may, by rule or order, impose an examination requirement upon:

(a) An applicant applying for licensing under this chapter; and

(b) Any class of applicants.

(2) Any examination required may be administered by the administrator or a designee of the administrator. Examinations may be oral, written, or both and may differ for each class of applicants.

(3) The administrator may, by order, waive any examination requirement imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section as to any applicant if the administrator determines that the examination is not necessary in the public interest and for the protection of investors.

[ 1986 c 14 s 26.]